Colorado, session 2026A, HB1206.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Access to safe, stable, and affordable housing is essential for
all Coloradans. Access to housing supports individual well-being, family
stability, workforce participation, and long-term economic growth for the
state.
(b) There is a severe housing supply shortfall in Colorado, which
represents the gap between the number of homes needed and those
available, estimated at approximately 106,000 units;
(c) Based on current population projections, to prevent further
growth of the housing supply shortfall, developers would need to
construct approximately 34,100 new homes annually in Colorado over the
next decade;
(d) The housing supply shortfall is particularly acute for renters
who earn an extremely low income (those who earn at or below 30% of
Area Median Income), since Colorado has a deficit of roughly 134,000
rental homes that are affordable for such households;
(e) Many households are cost-burdened, with 46.8% of renters and
-3- 1206

21.5% of homeowners spending over 30% of their income on housing.
Only 11% of renters could afford to purchase a typical home in Colorado
as of 2025.
(f) The affordability gap is not solely due to low supply; housing
prices and rents have increased faster than incomes, deepening the
challenge of obtaining stable, affordable homes, particularly for working
families, seniors, and other vulnerable populations;
(g) The work of public housing authorities and developers is
essential to expanding the stock of deeply affordable housing. However,
current financing tools and incentive structures do not sufficiently
prioritize or support these entities.
(h) Allowing housing authorities to collect tax revenue within
their jurisdictions will help these mission-driven entities more quickly
expand the supply of deeply affordable housing.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly finds and declares that
expanding and modernizing affordable housing funding tools:
(a) Is a matter of mixed statewide and local concern; and
(b) Will increase housing availability, affordability, and stability,
promote equitable development, and strengthen the public benefit of
development investments in Colorado communities.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-4-209, amend
(1)(x) and (1)(y); and add (1)(z), (4), (5), (6), and (7) as follows:
29-4-209. Powers of authority - definition.
(1) An authority shall constitute a body both corporate and politic,
exercising public powers and having all the powers necessary or
convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this
part 2, including the following powers in addition to others granted in this
-4- 1206

section:
(x) To make available to such agencies, boards, or commissions
as are charged with the duty of abating nuisances or demolishing unsafe
structures within its territorial limits its findings and recommendations
with regard to any building or property where conditions exist which are
dangerous to the public health, morals, safety, or welfare; and
(y) To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the
powers given in this part 2; AND
(z) TO PROVIDE FOR THE LEVY OF A UNIFORM SALES TAX, SALES
AND USE TAX, OR BOTH IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS
SECTION.
(4) (a) IF THE AUTHORITY ADOPTS A RESOLUTION DETERMINING
THAT THE LEVYING OF A SALES TAX, SALES AND USE TAX, OR BOTH WILL
FAIRLY DISTRIBUTE THE COSTS OF THE AUTHORITY'S ACTIVITIES AMONG
THE BENEFICIARIES OF THE AUTHORITY'S ACTIVITIES AND WILL NOT IMPOSE
AN UNDUE BURDEN ON ANY PARTICULAR GROUP OF PEOPLE OR BUSINESSES
AND THE COUNCIL CONSENTS TO SUBMITTING A QUESTION TO THE CITY'S
ELECTORS, THE COUNCIL SHALL SUBMIT TO THE CITY'S REGISTERED
ELECTORS A BALLOT QUESTION IN THE FORM APPROVED BY THE
AUTHORITY AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION. ALL NEW TAX REVENUES GENERATED BY THE
APPROVAL OF THE BALLOT QUESTION ARE IRREVOCABLY PLEDGED TO THE
AUTHORITY FOR THE PURPOSES SET FORTH IN THE APPROVED BALLOT
QUESTION, EXCEPTING ONLY THOSE DE MINIMUS ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS
EXPENDED BY THE CITY IN PRESENTING THE BALLOT QUESTION TO THE
ELECTORS AND EXPENDED BY THE CITY TO PAY THE DEPARTMENT OF
REVENUE ITS COSTS IN THE ADMINISTRATION AND COLLECTION OF THE
-5- 1206

APPROVED TAX.
(b) ANY SALES TAX, USE TAX, OR BOTH APPROVED PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (4) MUST BE LEVIED AT A RATE DETERMINED BY THE
AUTHORITY NOT TO EXCEED ONE PERCENT, UPON EVERY TRANSACTION OR
OTHER INCIDENT WITH RESPECT TO WHICH A SALES OR USE TAX IS LEVIED
BY THE STATE PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 26 OF TITLE 39, EXCLUDING THE
SALE OR USE OF CIGARETTES.
(c) ANY SALES TAX, USE TAX, OR BOTH APPROVED PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER SALES TAX, USE TAX,
OR BOTH IMPOSED PURSUANT TO LAW.
(d) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
SHALL COLLECT, ADMINISTER, AND ENFORCE ANY SALES TAX, SALES AND
USE TAX, OR BOTH AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4)
PURSUANT TO PART 2 OF ARTICLE 2 OF TITLE 29. NOTWITHSTANDING
SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE CITY SHALL PAY THE NET
INCREMENTAL COST INCURRED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN THE
ADMINISTRATION AND COLLECTION OF THE SALES AND USE TAX.

(5) (a) FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING AN AUTHORITY'S FISCAL
YEAR SPENDING LIMIT UNDER SECTION 20 (7)(b) OF ARTICLE X OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION, THE INITIAL SPENDING BASE OF THE AUTHORITY IS
THE AMOUNT OF REVENUES COLLECTED BY THE AUTHORITY FROM
SOURCES NOT EXCLUDED FROM FISCAL YEAR SPENDING PURSUANT TO
SECTION 20 (2)(e) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION DURING THE
FIRST FULL FISCAL YEAR FOR WHICH THE AUTHORITY COLLECTED
REVENUES.
(b) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (5), "FISCAL YEAR" MEANS ANY
-6- 1206

YEAR-LONG PERIOD USED BY AN AUTHORITY FOR FISCAL ACCOUNTING
PURPOSES.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND
EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES
TO ADMINISTER A SALES OR SALES AND USE TAX THAT IS LEVIED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION. THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE IS NOT
REQUIRED TO ADMINISTER A SALES OR SALES AND USE TAX THAT IS LEVIED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION UNTIL THE DEPARTMENT HAS
RECEIVED SUFFICIENT MONEY TO DO SO. FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2027-28
AND ANY SUBSEQUENT STATE FISCAL YEAR, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY
APPROPRIATE MONEY FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION.
(7) SUBSECTIONS (1)(z), (4), AND (5) OF THIS SECTION WILL TAKE
EFFECT IF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE RECEIVES AN AMOUNT OF GIFTS,
GRANTS, AND DONATIONS SUFFICIENT TO PAY FOR THE DEPARTMENT'S
COSTS IN ADMINISTERING A SALES OR SALES AND USE TAX LEVIED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION. THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN
WRITING OF THE DATE WHEN THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (7) HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. SUBSECTIONS (1)(z), (4), AND (5)
OF THIS SECTION TAKE EFFECT UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE
THAT THE DEPARTMENT RECEIVED AN AMOUNT OF GIFTS, GRANTS, AND
DONATIONS SUFFICIENT TO PAY FOR THE DEPARTMENT'S COSTS IN
ADMINISTERING A SALES OR SALES AND USE TAX LEVIED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION OR, IF THE NOTICE DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE,
UPON THE DATE OF THE NOTICE TO THE REVISOR OF STATUTES.
-7- 1206

SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-4-505, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(g); and add (1)(h), (1)(i), (2), (3), (4), and (5)
as follows:
29-4-505. Powers of authority - definition.
(1) A housing authority shall constitute a public body, corporate
and politic, exercise public and essential governmental functions, and
have all the powers necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate
the purposes and provisions of this part 5, (but not the power to levy and
collect taxes or special assessments) including the following powers:
(g) To do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out
the powers given AND THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED in this part 5; or the
purposes hereof.
(h) TO PROVIDE FOR THE LEVY OF A UNIFORM SALES TAX, SALES
AND USE TAX, OR BOTH IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(i) TO ISSUE REVENUE OR GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS AND TO
PLEDGE THE AUTHORITY'S REVENUES AND REVENUE-RAISING POWERS FOR
THE PAYMENT OF SUCH BONDS. SUCH BONDS MUST BE ISSUED ON THE
TERMS AND SUBJECT TO THE CONDITIONS SET FORTH IN SECTION 43-4-609.
(2) (a) IF THE HOUSING AUTHORITY ADOPTS A RESOLUTION
DETERMINING THAT THE LEVYING OF A SALES TAX, SALES AND USE TAX, OR
BOTH WILL FAIRLY DISTRIBUTE THE COSTS OF THE AUTHORITY'S ACTIVITIES
AMONG THE BENEFICIARIES OF THE AUTHORITY'S ACTIVITIES AND WILL
NOT IMPOSE AN UNDUE BURDEN ON ANY PARTICULAR GROUP OF PEOPLE OR
BUSINESSES AND THE BOARD CONSENTS TO SUBMITTING A QUESTION TO
THE COUNTY'S ELECTORS, THE COUNTY SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COUNTY'S
REGISTERED ELECTORS A BALLOT QUESTION IN THE FORM APPROVED BY
-8- 1206

THE AUTHORITY AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF
THE STATE CONSTITUTION. ALL NEW TAX REVENUES GENERATED BY THE
APPROVAL OF THE BALLOT QUESTION ARE IRREVOCABLY PLEDGED TO THE
HOUSING AUTHORITY FOR THE PURPOSES SET FORTH IN THE APPROVED
BALLOT QUESTION, EXCEPTING ONLY THOSE DE MINIMUS ADMINISTRATIVE
COSTS EXPENDED BY THE COUNTY IN PRESENTING THE BALLOT QUESTION
TO THE ELECTORS AND EXPENDED BY THE COUNTY TO PAY THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE ITS COSTS IN ADMINISTRATING THE COLLECTION
OF THE APPROVED TAX.
(b) ANY SALES TAX, USE TAX, OR BOTH APPROVED PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (2) MUST BE LEVIED AT A RATE DETERMINED BY THE
HOUSING AUTHORITY NOT TO EXCEED ONE PERCENT, UPON EVERY
TRANSACTION OR OTHER INCIDENT WITH RESPECT TO WHICH A SALES OR
USE TAX IS LEVIED BY THE STATE PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 26 OF TITLE 39,
EXCLUDING THE SALE OR USE OF CIGARETTES.
(c) ANY SALES TAX, USE TAX, OR BOTH APPROVED PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (2) IS IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER SALES TAX, USE TAX,
OR BOTH IMPOSED PURSUANT TO LAW.
(d) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
SHALL COLLECT, ADMINISTER, AND ENFORCE ANY SALES TAX, SALES AND
USE TAX, OR BOTH AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)
PURSUANT TO PART 2 OF ARTICLE 2 OF TITLE 29. NOTWITHSTANDING
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE COUNTY SHALL PAY THE NET
INCREMENTAL COST INCURRED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN THE
ADMINISTRATION AND COLLECTION OF THE SALES AND USE TAX.

(3) (a) FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING AN AUTHORITY'S FISCAL
-9- 1206

YEAR SPENDING LIMIT UNDER SECTION 20 (7)(b) OF ARTICLE X OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION, THE INITIAL SPENDING BASE OF THE AUTHORITY IS
THE AMOUNT OF REVENUES COLLECTED BY THE AUTHORITY FROM
SOURCES NOT EXCLUDED FROM FISCAL YEAR SPENDING PURSUANT TO
SECTION 20 (2)(e) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION DURING THE
FIRST FULL FISCAL YEAR FOR WHICH THE AUTHORITY COLLECTED
REVENUES.
(b) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3), "FISCAL YEAR" MEANS ANY
YEAR-LONG PERIOD USED BY AN AUTHORITY FOR FISCAL ACCOUNTING
PURPOSES.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND
EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES
TO ADMINISTER A SALES OR SALES AND USE TAX THAT IS LEVIED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION. THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE IS NOT
REQUIRED TO ADMINISTER A SALES OR SALES AND USE TAX THAT IS LEVIED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION UNTIL THE DEPARTMENT HAS
RECEIVED SUFFICIENT MONEY TO DO SO. FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2027-28
AND ANY SUBSEQUENT STATE FISCAL YEAR, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY
APPROPRIATE MONEY FROM THE GENERAL FUND FOR THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SECTION.
(7) SUBSECTIONS (1)(h), (1)(i), (2), AND (3) OF THIS SECTION WILL
TAKE EFFECT IF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE RECEIVES AN AMOUNT OF
GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS SUFFICIENT TO PAY FOR THE
DEPARTMENT'S COSTS IN ADMINISTERING A SALES OR SALES AND USE TAX
LEVIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION. THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF
THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SHALL NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES
IN WRITING OF THE DATE WHEN THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS
-10- 1206

SUBSECTION (7) HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. SUBSECTIONS (1)(h), (1)(i), (2),
AND (3) OF THIS SECTION TAKE EFFECT UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE
NOTICE THAT THE DEPARTMENT RECEIVED AN AMOUNT OF GIFTS, GRANTS,
AND DONATIONS SUFFICIENT TO PAY FOR THE DEPARTMENT'S COSTS IN
ADMINISTERING A SALES OR SALES AND USE TAX LEVIED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION OR, IF THE NOTICE DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE,
UPON THE DATE OF THE NOTICE TO THE REVISOR OF STATUTES.

SECTION 4. Effective date. This act takes effect January 1,
2027.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-11- 1206